Utah, session 2026, SB56.
Section 1. Section 53E-4-208 is enacted to read:53E-4-208. Legal awareness education for students.(1)As used in this section, "legal awareness information" means information regarding legal rights, responsibilities, and obligations that apply to individuals upon reaching the age of majority.(2)Beginning with the 2026-27 school year, an LEA shallmay ensure thatprovide each student in grade 10 receives legal awareness information that includes:(a)voting rights and voter registration requirements;(b)jury duty obligations and processes;(c)military selective service registration requirements;(d)the right to enter into contracts and legal consequences of contracts;(e)the right to legal representation in court proceedings;(f)medical decision-making authority and healthcare consent;(g)credit and debt obligations, including student loans;(h)tax filing requirements and obligations;(i)employment rights and workplace protections under federal and state law;(j)the adult criminal justice system and potential consequences of criminal violations, including criminal laws that will and do apply once entering certain age ranges;(k)civil liability and personal responsibility for actions;(l)individual rights during interactions with law enforcement;(m)educational privacy rights under federal law;(n)the right to access personal academic records; and(o)employment discrimination protections.(3)An LEA may provide the legal awareness information required under Subsection (2) through:(a)incorporation into existing coursework;(b)dedicated presentations or assemblies;(c)written materials or digital resources; or(d)any combination of methods described in Subsections (3)(a) through (c), as the local governing board determines appropriate.(4)AnIf an LEA shall ensure provides the legal awareness information described in Subsection (2), the LEA shall be providedprovide the information in a manner that is age-appropriate and accessible to all students.(5)An LEA shall:(a)may develop or adopt materials to fulfill the requirements of this section; and(b)if the LEA develops or adopts the materials under Subsection (5)(a), the LEA shall ensure that the information provided under this section is current and accurate.(6)This section does not:(a)require the creation of a new course or curriculum;(b)require student assessment or testing on the legal awareness information described in Subsection (2);(c)prevent an LEA from providing additional legal awareness information;(d)require a specific method of delivery; or(e)create a private right of action.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.